District of Columbia statutes.
32-1015

Application to revised wage orders.

Section 32-1004(a) shall not apply to any revised wage order issued by the Wage-Hour Board that sets a minimum wage that is higher than the minimum wage set by this subchapter.

Mar. 25, 1993, D.C. Law 9-248, § 16, 40 DCR 761
1981 Ed., § 36-220.14.